Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5184YC (1) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 728.12, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. It shall be unlawful to knowingly purchase or possess 3 using any means, including by computer, a visual depiction of a 4 minor engaging in a prohibited sexual act or the simulation of 5 a prohibited sexual act. 6